Maine, session 132, LD2073.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
State Police 0291
Initiative: Establishes 2 State Police Detective positions in the Maine State Police
Executive Protection Unit.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 2.000
Personal Services $0 $139,418
All Other $0 $6,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $145,918
148
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $75,070
All Other $0 $3,500
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $78,570